Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.045, is amended to read: 169.045 SPECIAL VEHICLE USE ON ROADWAY. Subdivision 1. new text begin Ordinance; new text end designation of roadwaydeleted text begin , permitdeleted text end new text begin ; definitionsnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end The governing body of any county, home rule charter or statutory city, or town may by ordinance authorize the operation of motorized golf carts, all-terrain vehicles, utility task vehicles, or mini trucks, on designated roadways ornew text begin roadwaynew text end portions deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end under its jurisdiction. deleted text begin Authorization to operate a motorized golf cart, all-terrain vehicle, utility task vehicle, or mini truck is by permit only.deleted text end new text begin The ordinance must designate the roadways and specify the types of motor vehicles for which operation is authorized. The ordinance may establish conditions of operation consistent with the requirements under this section, and may require issuance of a permit by the local unit of government for vehicle operation, as provided under subdivision 2.new text end new text begin (b)new text end For purposes of this section: (1) an all-terrain vehicle has the meaning given in section 84.92; (2) a mini truck has the meaning given in section 169.011, subdivision 40a; and (3) a utility task vehicle means a side-by-side, four-wheel drive, off-road vehicle that has four wheels, is propelled by an internal combustion engine with a piston displacement capacity of 1,200 cubic centimeters or less, and has a total dry weight of 1,800 but less than 2,600 pounds. Subd. 2. Ordinancenew text begin ; permitnew text end . deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin Annew text end ordinance deleted text begin shall designate the roadways,deleted text end new text begin that requires a permit for vehicle operation under this section mustnew text end prescribe the form of the application for the permitdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end require evidence of insurance complying with the provisions of section 65B.48, subdivision 5 deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin . The ordinancenew text end may prescribe conditions, not inconsistent with the provisions of this section, under which a permit may be granted. Permits may be granted for a period not to exceed three yearsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end and may be renewed. A permit may be revoked at any time if there is evidence that the permittee cannot safely operate the motorized golf cart, all-terrain vehicle, utility task vehicle, or mini truck on the designated roadways. The ordinance may require, as a condition to obtaining a permit, that the applicant submit a certificate signed by a physician that the applicant is able to safely operate deleted text begin a motorized golf cart, all-terrain vehicle, utility task vehicle, or mini truckdeleted text end new text begin the vehiclenew text end on the roadways designated. Subd. 3. Times of operation. Motorized golf carts, all-terrain vehicles, and utility task vehicles may only be operated on designated roadways from sunrise to sunset, unless equipped with original equipment headlights, taillights, and rear-facing brake lights. They deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not be operated in inclement weather, except during emergency conditions as provided in the ordinance, or when visibility is impaired by weather, smoke, fog or other conditions, or at any time when there is insufficient visibility to clearly see persons and vehicles on the roadway at a distance of 500 feet. Subd. 4. Slow-moving vehicle emblem. Motorized golf carts deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end display the slow-moving vehicle emblem provided for in section 169.522deleted text begin ,deleted text end when operated on designated roadways. Subd. 5. Crossing intersecting highways. The operatordeleted text begin , under permit, of a motorized golf cart, all-terrain vehicle, utility task vehicle, or mini truckdeleted text end new text begin of a vehicle pursuant to this sectionnew text end may cross any street or highway intersecting a designated roadway. Subd. 6. Application of traffic laws. Every person operating a deleted text begin motorized golf cart, all-terrain vehicle, utility task vehicle, or mini truck under permitdeleted text end new text begin vehiclenew text end on designated roadwaysnew text begin pursuant to this sectionnew text end has all the rights and duties applicable to the driver of any other vehicle under the provisions of this chapter, exceptnew text begin (1)new text end when those provisions cannot reasonably be applied to deleted text begin motorized golf carts, all-terrain vehicles, utility task vehicles, or mini trucksdeleted text end new text begin the vehicle,new text end and deleted text begin exceptdeleted text end new text begin (2)new text end as otherwise specifically provided in subdivision 7. Subd. 7. Nonapplication of certain laws. The provisions of chapter 171 are applicable to persons operating mini trucksdeleted text begin ,deleted text end but are not applicable to persons operating motorized golf carts, utility task vehicles, or all-terrain vehicles deleted text begin under permitdeleted text end on designated roadways pursuant to this section. Except for the requirements of section 169.70, the provisions of this chapter relating to equipment on vehicles are not applicable to motorized golf carts, utility task vehicles, or all-terrain vehicles operatingdeleted text begin , under permit,deleted text end on designated roadwaysnew text begin pursuant to this sectionnew text end . Subd. 7a. Required equipment on mini trucks. Notwithstanding sections 169.48 to 169.68deleted text begin ,deleted text end or any other law, a mini truck may be operated deleted text begin under permitdeleted text end on designated roadwaysnew text begin pursuant to this sectionnew text end if it is equipped with: (1) at least two headlamps; (2) at least two taillamps; (3) front and rear turn-signal lamps; (4) an exterior mirror mounted on the driver's side of the vehicle and either (i) an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger's side of the vehicle or (ii) an interior mirror; (5) a windshield; (6) a seat belt for the driver and front passenger; and (7) a parking brake. Subd. 8. Insurance. In the event deleted text begin personsdeleted text end new text begin a personnew text end operating a motorized golf cart, utility task vehicle, all-terrain vehicle, or mini truck under this section cannot obtain liability insurance in the private market, that person may purchase automobile insurance, including no-fault coverage, from the Minnesota Automobile Insurance Plan under sections 65B.01 to 65B.12, at a rate to be determined by the commissioner of commerce. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end